California, session 20252026, AB2697.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 26204 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:26204. (a) A local jurisdiction may authorize a licensed retailer to conduct sales or deliveries at a drive-through, pass-out window, or slide-out tray to the exterior of the licensed premises, if the sales and deliveries are made through a fixed-pane security window with a security drawer. retailer or microbusiness licensed under this division that conducts storefront retail sales from a premises to sell cannabis or cannabis products to a customer in a motor vehicle in a drive-through located on the premises.(b)A retailer who conducts sales or deliveries through a drive-through, pass-out window, or slide-out tray to the exterior of the licensed premises shall do so in compliance with this division.(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), drive-through sales authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) shall occur through a fixed-pane security window with a security drawer or similar secure transfer mechanism that is part of a building located within the premises.(2) A retailer or microbusiness licensed under this division that conducted retail sales through a drive-through in compliance with state and local law before January 1, 2027, is not subject to the requirements of paragraph (1).(c) This section shall not apply to a licensee that conducts retail sales exclusively through delivery or that does not maintain a premises open to the public for retail sales.(d) Sales conducted pursuant to this section shall comply with this division and any regulations adopted by the department.(e) This section does not limit the authority of a local jurisdiction under Section 26200 to regulate drive-through sales authorized pursuant to this section.